Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:(1) The commission shall establish and provide no fewer than two basic law enforcement academy classes at a new regional training academy in the largest city within a county with a population greater than 300,000 persons. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for 100 percent of the costs of providing two classes per year beginning in fiscal year 2026. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements. The criminal justice training commission must track and report the average wait time for students at the beginning of each class and provide the findings in an annual report to the legislature due in December of each year. The two classes per year are in addition to the classes currently provided by the commission.(2) For the purposes of this section, the commission must use the most recent population estimates published by the office of financial management.(3) This section expires July 1, 2045.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from the general fund to the criminal justice training commission for the purposes of section 1 of this act.--- END ---